New York, session 2025-2026, A10781.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 35 of the judiciary 2 law, as amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 a. When a court orders a hearing in a proceeding upon a writ of habeas 5 corpus to inquire into the cause of detention of a person in custody in 6 a state institution, or when it orders a hearing in a civil proceeding 7 to commit or transfer a person to or retain a person in a state institu- 8 tion when such person is alleged to be [mentally ill, mentally defective 9 or] a person with substance use disorder, a person with a mental health 10 disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery, 11 or when it orders a hearing for the commitment of the guardianship and 12 custody of a child to an authorized agency by reason of the mental 13 illness or developmental disability of a parent, or when it orders a 14 hearing to determine whether consent to the adoption of a child shall be 15 required of a parent who is alleged to be mentally ill or develop- 16 mentally disabled, or when it orders a hearing to determine the best 17 interests of a child when the parent of the child revokes a consent to 18 the adoption of such child and such revocation is opposed or in any 19 adoption or custody proceeding if it determines that assignment of coun- 20 sel in such cases is mandated by the constitution of this state or of 21 the United States, the court may assign counsel to represent such person EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09004-02-6 A. 10781 2 1 if it is satisfied that such person is financially unable to obtain 2 counsel. Upon an appeal taken from an order entered in any such proceed- 3 ing, the appellate court may assign counsel to represent such person 4 upon the appeal if it is satisfied that such person is financially 5 unable to obtain counsel. 6 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 35 of the judiciary law, as amended by 7 chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 4. In any proceeding described in paragraph a of subdivision one of 9 this section, when a person is alleged to be [mentally ill, mentally 10 defective or] a person with substance use disorder, a person with a 11 mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person 12 in recovery, the court which ordered the hearing may appoint no more 13 than two psychiatrists, certified psychologists or physicians to examine 14 and testify at the hearing upon the condition of such person. A psychia- 15 trist, psychologist or physician so appointed shall, upon completion of 16 their services, receive reimbursement for expenses reasonably incurred 17 and reasonable compensation for such services, to be fixed by the court. 18 Such compensation shall not exceed three thousand dollars, except that 19 in extraordinary circumstances the court may provide for compensation in 20 excess of the foregoing limits. 21 § 3. Paragraph (i) of subdivision (b) of section 32.05 of the mental 22 hygiene law, as amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 (i) Methadone, or such other controlled substance designated by the 25 commissioner of health as appropriate for such use, may be administered 26 to a person with substance use disorder, a person with a mental health 27 disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery, 28 as defined in section thirty-three hundred two of the public health law, 29 by individual physicians, groups of physicians and public or private 30 medical facilities certified pursuant to article twenty-eight or thir- 31 ty-three of the public health law as part of a chemical dependence 32 program which has been issued an operating certificate by the commis- 33 sioner pursuant to subdivision (b) of section 32.09 of this article, 34 provided, however, that such administration must be done in accordance 35 with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations. Individual 36 physicians or groups of physicians who have obtained authorization from 37 the federal government to administer buprenorphine to people with 38 substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person 39 with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery may do so without 40 obtaining an operating certificate from the commissioner. 41 § 4. Paragraph 5 of subdivision (b) of section 32.09 of the mental 42 hygiene law, as amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended 43 to read as follows: 44 5. the applicant will establish procedures to effectively implement a 45 detoxification program to further relieve people with substance use 46 disorder, people with a mental health disorder, people with co-occurring 47 disorder, or people in recovery from dependence upon methadone or such 48 other controlled substances prescribed for treatment in subject mainte- 49 nance programs. 50 § 5. Subdivision 1 of section 3302 of the public health law, as 51 amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as 52 follows: 53 1. "Person with substance use disorder, person with a mental health 54 disorder, person with co-occurring disorder, or person in recovery" 55 means a person who habitually uses a controlled substance for a non-leg- A. 10781 3 1 itimate or unlawful use, and who by reason of such use is dependent 2 thereon. 3 § 6. Subdivision 1 of section 3331 of the public health law, as 4 amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 1. Except as provided in titles III or V of this article, no substance 7 in schedules II, III, IV, or V may be prescribed for or dispensed or 8 administered to a person with substance use disorder, a person with a 9 mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person 10 in recovery or habitual user. 11 § 7. The title heading of title V of article 33 of the public health 12 law, as amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read 13 as follows: 14 DISPENSING TO PERSONS WITH SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER, PERSONS WITH A MENTAL 15 HEALTH DISORDER, PERSONS WITH CO-OCCURRING DISORDER, PERSONS IN RECOVERY 16 AND HABITUAL USERS 17 § 8. Section 3350 of the public health law, as amended by chapter 511 18 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 § 3350. Dispensing prohibition. Controlled substances may not be 20 prescribed for, or administered or dispensed to persons with substance 21 use disorder, persons with a mental health disorder, persons with co-oc- 22 curring disorder, or persons in recovery or habitual users of controlled 23 substances, except as provided by this title or title III of this arti- 24 cle. 25 § 9. Section 3351 of the public health law, as separately amended by 26 chapters 511 and 546 of the laws of 2025 and subdivision 3 as separately 27 amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025 and chapter 42 of the laws of 28 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 § 3351. Dispensing for medical use. 1. Controlled substances may be 30 prescribed for, or administered or dispensed to a person with substance 31 use disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person with 32 co-occurring disorder, a person in recovery, or habitual user: 33 (a) during emergency medical treatment unrelated to [abuse] the use of 34 controlled substances; 35 (b) who is a bona fide patient suffering from an incurable and fatal 36 disease such as cancer or advanced tuberculosis; or 37 (c) who is aged, infirm, or suffering from serious injury or illness 38 and the withdrawal from controlled substances would endanger the life or 39 impede or inhibit the recovery of such person. 40 2. Controlled substances may be ordered for use by a person with 41 substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person 42 with co-occurring disorder, a person in recovery, or habitual user by a 43 practitioner and administered by a practitioner or registered nurse to 44 relieve acute withdrawal symptoms. 45 3. A practitioner may prescribe, administer, and dispense any schedule 46 III, IV, or V narcotic drug approved by the federal food and drug admin- 47 istration specifically for use in maintenance or detoxification treat- 48 ment to a person with substance use disorder, a person with a mental 49 health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, a person in recov- 50 ery, or habitual user. 51 4. Methadone, or such other controlled substance designated by the 52 commissioner as appropriate for such use, may be ordered for use of a 53 person with substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disor- 54 der, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery by a A. 10781 4 1 practitioner and dispensed or administered by a practitioner or a such 2 practitioner's designated agent as interim treatment for a person with 3 substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person 4 with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery, while arrangements 5 are being made for referral to treatment for such addiction to 6 controlled substances. 7 5. Methadone, or such other controlled substance designated by the 8 commissioner as appropriate for such use, may be administered to a 9 person with substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disor- 10 der, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery by a 11 practitioner or by a such practitioner's designated agent acting under 12 the direction and supervision of a practitioner, as part of a regimen 13 designed and intended to withdraw a patient from addiction to controlled 14 substances. 15 6. Notwithstanding any other law and consistent with federal require- 16 ments, methadone, or such other controlled substance designated by the 17 commissioner as appropriate for such use, may be administered or 18 dispensed directly to a person with substance use disorder, a person 19 with a mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a 20 person in recovery by a practitioner or by a such practitioner's desig- 21 nated agent acting under the direction and supervision of a practition- 22 er, as part of a substance use or chemical dependence program approved 23 pursuant to article thirty-two of the mental hygiene law. 24 § 10. Subdivisions 2 and 3 of section 396-h of the county law, as 25 amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, are amended to read as 26 follows: 27 2. To establish in-patient and out-patient treatment facilities for 28 persons with substance use disorders, persons with a mental health 29 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery. 30 Such facilities shall include, but shall not be limited to: 31 a. detoxification centers and clinics for the out-patient treatment of 32 persons with substance use disorders, persons with a mental health 33 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery; 34 b. a treatment center where persons with substance use disorders, 35 persons with a mental health disorder, persons with co-occurring disor- 36 der, and persons in recovery may obtain professional counseling from 37 physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists and where possible, other 38 persons with substance use disorders, persons with a mental health 39 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery; 40 c. half-way houses to provide continuing treatment for persons with 41 substance use disorders, persons with a mental health disorder, persons 42 with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery. 43 3. To create a referral program whereby persons with substance use 44 disorders, persons with a mental health disorder, persons with co-occur- 45 ring disorder, and persons in recovery and persons and agencies 46 concerned with their treatment will make use of the aforementioned 47 treatment facilities; 48 § 11. Subdivisions 2, 3, 6 and 10 of section 121 of the general city 49 law, subdivisions 2 and 3 as amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025 50 and subdivisions 6 and 10 as added by chapter 820 of the laws of 1971, 51 are amended to read as follows: 52 2. To establish in-patient and out-patient treatment facilities for 53 persons with substance use disorders, persons with a mental health 54 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery. 55 Such facilities shall include, but shall not be limited to: A. 10781 5 1 a. detoxification centers and clinics for the out-patient treatment of 2 persons with substance use disorders, persons with a mental health 3 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery; 4 b. a treatment center where persons with substance use disorders, 5 persons with a mental health disorder, persons with co-occurring disor- 6 der, and persons in recovery may obtain professional counseling from 7 physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists and where possible, other 8 persons with substance use disorders, persons with a mental health 9 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery; 10 c. half-way houses to provide continuing treatment for persons with 11 substance use disorders, persons with a mental health disorder, persons 12 with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery. 13 3. To create a referral program whereby persons with substance use 14 disorders, persons with a mental health disorder, persons with co-occur- 15 ring disorder, and persons in recovery and persons and agencies 16 concerned with their treatment will make use of the aforementioned 17 treatment facilities; 18 6. To encourage and foster, if possible, the use of [former drug abus- 19 ers and persons formerly addicted to drugs] persons with a substance use 20 disorder, persons with a mental health disorder, persons with co-occur- 21 ring disorder, and persons in recovery who are no longer using drugs as 22 staff personnel; 23 10. To utilize [former drug abusers and ex-addicts] persons with a 24 substance use disorder, persons with a mental health disorder, persons 25 with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery who are no longer 26 using drugs in educational counseling and make periodic evaluations of 27 their effectiveness; 28 § 12. Section 3028-a of the education law, as amended by chapter 19 of 29 the laws of 1987, is amended to read as follows: 30 § 3028-a. Students under twenty-one years of age suspected of [alcohol 31 abuse or narcotic addiction] being a person with a substance use 32 disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person with co-oc- 33 curring disorder, or a person in recovery. Any teacher, school adminis- 34 trator, school guidance counselor, school psychologist, school drug 35 counselor, school nurse, supervisor of attendance, attendance teacher or 36 attendance officer having reasonable cause to suspect that a secondary 37 or elementary student under twenty-one years of age is a [substance or 38 alcohol abuser or substance dependent] person with a substance use 39 disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person with co-oc- 40 curring disorder, or a person in recovery, who report such information 41 to the appropriate secondary or elementary school officials pursuant to 42 the school's drug policy or if the school has no drug policy to the 43 school's principal or the parents or legal guardians of such student 44 under twenty-one years of age shall have immunity from any civil liabil- 45 ity that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of the 46 making of such a report. 47 § 13. The fifth undesignated paragraph of section 19.01 of the mental 48 hygiene law, as added by chapter 223 of the laws of 1992, is amended to 49 read as follows: 50 Substantial benefits can be gained through [alcoholism] alcohol use 51 and substance [abuse] use treatment for both [addicted individuals] 52 persons with a substance use disorder, persons with a mental health 53 disorder, persons with co-occurring disorder, and persons in recovery 54 and their families. Positive treatment outcomes that may be generated 55 through a complete continuum of care offer a cost effective and compre- 56 hensive approach to rehabilitating such individuals. The primary goals A. 10781 6 1 of the rehabilitation and recovery process are to restore social, fami- 2 ly, lifestyle, vocational and economic supports by stabilizing an indi- 3 vidual's physical and psychological functioning. The legislature recog- 4 nizes the importance of varying treatment approaches and levels of care 5 designed to meet each client's needs. Relapse prevention and aftercare 6 are two primary components of treatment that serve to promote and main- 7 tain recovery. 8 § 14. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 2897 of the public 9 health law, as amended by chapter 550 of the laws of 1978, is amended to 10 read as follows: 11 (c) [he] such administrator is or has been [an alcohol abuser or is or 12 has been addicted] a person with a substance use disorder, a person 13 with a mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a 14 person in recovery related to the use of morphine, cocaine or other 15 drugs having similar effect[, or has become mentally ill]; 16 § 15. Paragraph (h) of subdivision 1 of section 3450 of the public 17 health law, as amended by chapter 534 of the laws of 1983, is amended to 18 read as follows: 19 (h) is [addicted] a person with a substance use disorder, a person 20 with a mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a 21 person in recovery related to the use of morphine, opium, cocaine or 22 other drugs having a similar effect; 23 § 16. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 400.00 of the penal 24 law, as separately amended by chapters 371 and 669 of the laws of 2022, 25 is amended to read as follows: 26 (e) who is not an unlawful user of or [addicted] a person with a 27 substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a 28 person with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery related to 29 any controlled substance as defined in section 21 U.S.C. 802; 30 § 17. Section 63 of the railroad law is amended to read as follows: 31 § 63. Persons employed as drivers, conductors, [motormen] engineers or 32 [gripmen] grip operators. Any railroad corporation may employ any 33 inhabitant of the state, of the age of twenty-one years, [not addicted] 34 who is not a person with a substance use disorder, a person with a 35 mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a person 36 in recovery related to the use of intoxicating liquors, as a car driver, 37 conductor, [motorman] engineer or [gripman] grip operator, or in any 38 other capacity, if fit and competent therefor. All applicants for posi- 39 tions as [motormen] engineers or [gripmen] grip operators on any street 40 surface railroad in this state shall be subjected to a thorough examina- 41 tion by the officers of the corporation as to their habits, physical 42 ability and intelligence. If this examination is satisfactory, the 43 applicant shall be placed in the shop or power house where [he] they can 44 be made familiar with the power and machinery [he is] they are about to 45 control. [He] They shall then be placed on a car with an instructor, and 46 when the latter is satisfied as to the applicant's capability for the 47 position of [motorman] engineer or [gripman] grip operator, [he] they 48 shall so certify to the officers of the company, and, if appointed, the 49 applicant shall first serve on the lines of least travel. Any violation 50 of the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor. 51 § 18. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 303 of the social 52 services law, as amended by chapter 198 of the laws of 1975, is amended 53 to read as follows: 54 (c) Replacement of lost or mismanaged cash by a person who by reason 55 of advanced age, illness, infirmity, mental weakness, physical handicap, 56 intemperance, [addiction to drugs] being a person with a substance use A. 10781 7 1 disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person with co-oc- 2 curring disorder, or a person in recovery, or other cause, has suffered 3 substantial impairment of [his] their ability to care for [his] their 4 property; 5 § 19. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 5 of chapter 274 of 6 the laws of 1946, constituting the emergency housing rent control law, 7 as amended by section 16 of part Q of chapter 39 of the laws of 2019, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 (a) the landlord seeks in good faith to recover possession of a hous- 10 ing accommodation because of immediate and compelling necessity for [his 11 or her] their own personal use and occupancy as [his or her] their 12 primary residence or for the use and occupancy of [his or her] their 13 immediate family as their primary residence; provided, however, this 14 subdivision shall permit recovery of only one housing accommodation and 15 shall not apply where a member of the household lawfully occupying the 16 housing accommodation is sixty-two years of age or older, has been a 17 tenant in a housing accommodation in that building for fifteen years or 18 more, or has an impairment which results from anatomical, physiological 19 or psychological conditions, other than [addiction] being a person with 20 substance use disorder, a person with a mental health disorder, a person 21 with co-occurring disorder, or a person in recovery related to alcohol, 22 gambling, or any controlled substance, which are demonstrable by 23 medically acceptable clinical and laboratory diagnostic techniques, and 24 which are expected to be permanent and which prevent the tenant from 25 engaging in any substantial gainful employment; provided, however, that 26 a tenant required to surrender a housing accommodation under this para- 27 graph shall have a cause of action in any court of competent jurisdic- 28 tion for damages, declaratory, and injunctive relief against a landlord 29 or purchaser of the premises who makes a fraudulent statement regarding 30 a proposed use of the housing accommodation. In any action or proceeding 31 brought pursuant to this paragraph a prevailing tenant shall be entitled 32 to recovery of actual damages, and reasonable attorneys' fees; or 33 § 20. Subdivision a of section 10 of section 4 of chapter 576 of the 34 laws of 1974, constituting the emergency tenant protection act of nine- 35 teen seventy-four, as amended by section 15 of part Q of chapter 39 of 36 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 37 a. For cities having a population of less than one million and towns 38 and villages, the state division of housing and community renewal shall 39 be empowered to implement this act by appropriate regulations. Such 40 regulations may encompass such speculative or manipulative practices or 41 renting or leasing practices as the state division of housing and commu- 42 nity renewal determines constitute or are likely to cause circumvention 43 of this act. Such regulations shall prohibit practices which are likely 44 to prevent any person from asserting any right or remedy granted by this 45 act, including but not limited to retaliatory termination of periodic 46 tenancies and shall require owners to grant a new one or two year vacan- 47 cy or renewal lease at the option of the tenant, except where a mortgage 48 or mortgage commitment existing as of the local effective date of this 49 act provides that the owner shall not grant a one-year lease; and shall 50 prescribe standards with respect to the terms and conditions of new and 51 renewal leases, additional rent and such related matters as security 52 deposits, advance rental payments, the use of escalator clauses in leas- 53 es and provision for increase in rentals for garages and other ancillary 54 facilities, so as to ensure that the level of rent adjustments author- 55 ized under this law will not be subverted and made ineffective. Any 56 provision of the regulations permitting an owner to refuse to renew a A. 10781 8 1 lease on grounds that the owner seeks to recover possession of a housing 2 accommodation for [his or her] their own use and occupancy or for the 3 use and occupancy of [his or her] their immediate family shall permit 4 recovery of only one housing accommodation, shall require that an owner 5 demonstrate immediate and compelling need and that the housing accommo- 6 dation will be the proposed occupants' primary residence and shall not 7 apply where a member of the housing accommodation is sixty-two years of 8 age or older, has been a tenant in a housing accommodation in that 9 building for fifteen years or more, or has an impairment which results 10 from anatomical, physiological or psychological conditions, other than 11 [addiction] being a person with a substance use disorder, a person with 12 a mental health disorder, a person with co-occurring disorder, or a 13 person in recovery related to alcohol, gambling, or any controlled 14 substance, which are demonstrable by medically acceptable clinical and 15 laboratory diagnostic techniques, and which are expected to be permanent 16 and which prevent the tenant from engaging in any substantial gainful 17 employment; provided, however, that a tenant required to surrender a 18 housing accommodation under this subdivision shall have a cause of 19 action in any court of competent jurisdiction for damages, declaratory, 20 and injunctive relief against a landlord or purchaser of the premises 21 who makes a fraudulent statement regarding a proposed use of the housing 22 accommodation. In any action or proceeding brought pursuant to this 23 subdivision a prevailing tenant shall be entitled to recovery of actual 24 damages, and reasonable attorneys' fees. 25 § 21. Section 28 of the general construction law, as added by chapter 26 351 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 27 § 28. Mental disability, mental illness, developmental disability, 28 addictive disorder and addiction disorder. The terms mental disability, 29 mental illness, developmental disability, addictive disorder and 30 addiction disorder shall have the same meaning as they are defined 31 pursuant to section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law. Hereafter, in any 32 law, rule, regulation, ordinance or resolution, person-first terms, 33 including but not limited to "a person with a substance use disorder", 34 "a person with a mental health disorder", "a person with co-occurring 35 disorder", or "a person in recovery", shall be used in substitution 36 therefor and with the same force and effect. 37 § 22. This act shall take effect immediately.